Oklahoma, session 2025, SB348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-117, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5-117. A. The board of education of each school


district shall have power to:


1. Elect its own officers; provided that the chair of the board


authorized in Section 5-107B of this title shall be elected by the


electors of the school district;


2. Make rules, not inconsistent with the law or rules of the


State Board of Education, governing the board and the school system


of the district, including converting all or part of a traditional


public school to a conversion school;


3. Maintain and operate a complete public school system of such


character as the board of education shall deem best suited to the


needs of the school district;


4. Designate the schools to be attended by the children of the


district;



Req. No. 833 Page 2


5. Provide and operate, when deemed advisable, cafeterias or


other eating accommodations, thrift banks, or other facilities for


the teaching and practice of thrift and economy, bookstores, print


shops, and vocational and other shops;


6. Provide informational material concerning school bond


elections and millage elections, including, but not limited to, all


pertinent financial information relative to the bond issue, a


statement of revenue sources necessary to retire proposed bonds, a


statement of current bonded indebtedness of the school district, and


a statement of proposed use of funds to be generated by the proposed


bond issue. The informational material shall not contain the words


“vote yes” or “vote no” or any similar words or statement any place


anyplace on such informational material;


7. Purchase, construct, or rent, and operate and maintain,


classrooms, libraries, auditoriums, gymnasiums, stadiums, recreation


places and playgrounds, teacherages, school bus garages,


laboratories, administration buildings, and other schoolhouses and


school buildings, and acquire sites and equipment for the operation


of public schools or conversion schools;


8. a. Insure the school district or its employees against


any loss, damage, or liability as defined by Sections


702 through 708 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


or other forms of insurance provided for in Title 36


of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 833 Page 3


b. Subject to the restrictions of liability in the The


Governmental Tort Claims Act:


(1) insure the school district against all or any


part of any liability it may incur for death,


injury, or disability of any person, or for


damage to property, either real or personal,


(2) insure any employee of the school district


against all or any part of the employee’s


liability for injury or damage resulting from an


act or omission in the scope of employment, or


(3) insure against the expense of defending a claim


against the school district or its employee,


whether or not liability exists on such claim.


c. As used in this subsection, “employee” means any


person who has acted in on behalf of a school


district, whether that person is acting on a permanent


or temporary basis with or without being compensated


or on a full-time or part-time basis. Employee also


includes all elected or appointed officers, members of


governing bodies of a school district, and persons


appointed, and other persons designated by a school


district to act in its behalf.


d. The cost or premium of any such insurance is a proper


expenditure of the school district.

Req. No. 833 Page 4


e. Any insurance authorized by law to be purchased,


obtained, or provided by a school district may be


provided by:


(1) self-insurance, which may be, but is not required


to be, funded by appropriations to establish or


maintain reserves for self-insurance purposes.


Any self-insurance reserve fund shall be


nonfiscal and shall not be considered in


computing any levy when the school district makes


its annual estimate for needed appropriations,


(2) insurance in any insurer authorized to transact


insurance in this state,


(3) insurance secured in accordance with any other


method provided by law, or


(4) any combination of insurance authorized by this


section subsection.


f. Two or more school districts or public agencies, by


interlocal agreement made pursuant to the Interlocal


Cooperation Act, may provide insurance for any purpose


by any one or more of the methods specified in this


section subsection. The pooling of self-insured


reserves, claims, or losses among governments as


authorized in this section subsection shall not be


construed to be transacting insurance nor otherwise

Req. No. 833 Page 5


subject to the provisions of the laws of this state


regulating insurance or insurance companies, except as


to the provisions of Section 607.1 of Title 36 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. Two or more school districts may


also be insured under a master policy or contract of


insurance. Premium costs may be set individually for


each school district or apportioned among


participating school districts as provided by the


master policy or contract;


9. Acquire property by condemnation proceedings in the same


manner as land is condemned for railroad purposes. School district


funds may be used to erect buildings on leased land on which other


buildings have been erected prior to April 3, 1969, or on land which


is leased from a governmental entity;


10. Lease real or personal property to the state or any


political subdivision thereof or a not-for-profit entity operating


pursuant to Section 868 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes for


nominal cash consideration for so long as the use of the property by


the lessee substantially benefits, in whole or in part, the same


public served by the school district;


11. a. Dispose of personal or real property no longer needed


by the district by sale, exchange, lease, lease-


purchase, sale, and partial lease back, or otherwise.


Real property shall be conveyed pursuant to a public

Req. No. 833 Page 6


sale, public bid, or private sale; provided, however,


unless otherwise prohibited by law, the board of


education of a consolidated or annexed school district


or any other school district may convey real property


to a local political subdivision or to an educational


institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education or to a housing authority formed pursuant to


the provisions of Section 1057 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes without consideration. Prior to the


sale of any real property, the board of education


shall have the real property appraised. The appraisal


shall be confidential until the real property is sold.


When the real property is sold, the board of education


shall make the appraisal available for public


inspection. Prior to the conveyance of any real


property by private sale, the board of education shall


have offered the real property for sale by public sale


or public bid. Any conveyance of real property by


private sale to a nonprofit organization, association,


or corporation to be used for public purposes, unless


for exchange, shall contain a reversionary clause


which returns the real property to the board of


education upon the cessation of the use without profit



Req. No. 833 Page 7


or for public purposes by the purchaser or the assigns


of the purchaser,


b. If a board of education makes the decision to dispose


of real or personal property that is leased at the


time the decision is made, whether such disposal is by


public sale, public bid, or private sale, the lessee


shall have a right of first refusal to purchase the


property on the following terms and conditions:


(1) if a board of education receives a bid or offer


in a public sale, public bid, or private sale for


any real or personal property that it desires to


accept, then it shall provide notice to the


lessee of the property. The notice shall include


the identity of the prospective purchaser of the


property, the terms and conditions of the


proposed sale, and the purchase price to be paid


by the prospective purchaser, and


(2) the lessee shall have thirty (30) days after


receipt of the notice to inform the board of


education that it elects to purchase the property


on the same terms and conditions set forth in the


notice, in which event the board of education


shall convey the property to the lessee on all


the same terms and conditions set forth in the

Req. No. 833 Page 8


notice; provided, however, that if any portion of


the consideration included in the purchase price


set forth in the notice is not in cash, then the


lessee shall be entitled to pay the fair market


value in cash of such noncash consideration;


12. Purchase necessary property, equipment, furniture, and


supplies necessary to maintain and operate an adequate school


system;


13. Incur all expenses, within the limitations provided for by


law, necessary to perform all powers granted by the provisions of


this section;


14. Contract with and fix the duties and compensation of


physicians, dentists, optometrists, nurses, attorneys,


superintendents, principals, teachers, bus drivers, janitors, and


other necessary employees of the district;


15. Establish a written policy for reimbursement of necessary


travel expenses of employees and members of the board. The policy


may include in-district travel from the site of employment


assignment which is necessary in the performance of employment


duties. The written policy shall specify procedures, contain


documentation requirements, and may include payment of meal expenses


during authorized travel on a per diem allowance basis rather than


itemized documentation;



Req. No. 833 Page 9


16. Pay necessary travel expenses and other related expenses of


prospective employees for sponsored visits to the school district


pursuant to a written policy specifying procedures containing


documentation requirements equal to or greater than the requirements


specified by law for state employees in the State Travel


Reimbursement Act;


17. Provide for employees’ leaves of absence without pay;


18. Exercise sole control over all the schools and property of


the district, subject to other provisions of the Oklahoma School


Code;


19. Allow district-owned school buses to be used for


transportation of students from other districts or educational


institutions while within the district on educational tours. This


The provisions of this paragraph shall not restrict the authority of


the board to authorize any other use of such buses which may now be


permitted by law or rule of the State Board of Education;


20. Enter into contractual agreements with the board of


trustees of a multicounty library system, as defined in Section 4-


103 of Title 65 of the Oklahoma Statutes, a city-county library


commission, as defined in Section 152 of Title 65 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, or a rural single county library system, as defined in


Section 1-104 of Title 65 of the Oklahoma Statutes, on such terms as


may be mutually agreed, except no district board of education may


enter into any agreement under which the library services for the

Req. No. 833 Page 10


school would be provided at any site other than the school site or


which would result in library services that do not meet


accreditation standards as required by law or rule;


21. Perform all functions necessary to the administration of a


school district in Oklahoma this state as specified in the Oklahoma


School Code, and in addition thereto, those powers necessarily


implied but not delegated by law to any other agency or official;


22. Prepare and distribute at the expense of the school


district any and all material which has the purpose of informing the


public about district activities;


23. Solicit and accept any gift, grant, or donation of money or


property for the use of the school district. Any gift, grant, or


donation of money may be deposited in the general fund or building


fund of the school district; and


24. Pay necessary meal and lodging expenses of school district


students and sponsors involved in authorized school-sponsored


cocurricular activities. The board of education shall establish a


written policy for reimbursement of necessary meal and lodging


expenses of school district students and sponsors. The written


policy shall specify procedures, contain documentation requirements,


and designate the funds from which reimbursement may be made.


Reimbursement may be made from the General Fund.


B. The board of education of any school district may rent real


and personal property, if such items are necessary for the operation

Req. No. 833 Page 11


of the school, and pay the rental charges for the usage during any


fiscal year, or portion thereof, out of appropriations made and


approved for current expense purposes during the fiscal year. Any


rental contract extending beyond June 30 of the fiscal year shall be


void unless it contains provisions for mutual ratification of


renewal pursuant to the conditions provided for in this subsection.


It is the intent of this subsection to authorize boards of education


to enter into lease contracts but not to incur any obligation


against the school district in excess of the income and revenue


provided for such purposes for the fiscal year in which the lease


contract is operative. Any lease or lease-purchase agreement


entered into by any board of education shall state the purchase


price of real or personal property so leased. The lease or lease-


purchase shall not be extended so as to cause payment of more than


the original purchase price of the real or personal property, plus


interest not to exceed the legal rate. When the purchase price plus


interest has been paid, the property shall belong to the lessee and


the lessor shall deliver a deed or bill of sale to the property to


the lessee. When any real or personal property has been leased or


rented during any fiscal year pursuant to the provisions of any


contract which permits continuance of the rental for the remainder


of the fiscal year, the renting or leasing of the property shall be


continued for the remainder of the fiscal year unless the board of


education renting or leasing the same certifies by proper resolution

Req. No. 833 Page 12


entered in the minutes of the board of education that the


continuance of the rental is unnecessary and contrary to the public


interest. Any lease-purchase agreement entered into shall include


the right of a school district to acquire buildings, equipment, or


other facilities or discrete components thereof or improve school


sites through a lease-purchase agreement. A school district may use


proceeds derived from the sale of bonds as authorized by Section 26


of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution to make lease-purchase


payments, including interest, under a lease-purchase agreement. For


purposes of this subsection, the term “acquired” as used in Section


of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution shall mean the


possession, control, or power to dispose of personal or real


property.


C. The boards of education of two or more school districts may


enter into cooperative agreements and maintain joint programs


including, but not limited to, courses of instruction for


handicapped children with disabilities, courses of instruction in


music and other subjects, practical instruction for trades and


vocations, practical instruction in driver training courses, and


health programs including visual care by persons legally licensed


for such purpose, without favoritism as to either profession. The


revenues necessary to operate a joint program approved in


cooperative agreements, whether from federal, state, or local


sources, including the individual contributions of participating

Req. No. 833 Page 13


school districts, shall be deposited into a fund separate from all


other appropriated funds. The beginning fund balance each year,


combined with all actual revenues, including collected and estimated


revenues, must shall be appropriated before being expended.


Purchase orders shall be issued against available appropriations


and, once goods or services have been received, either payable or


nonpayable warrants shall be issued in payment of all purchase


orders. The fund shall be reported as a separate appropriated fund


in all the financial reports of the school district which is chosen


by the other school districts to keep the accounting records of the


joint program.


D. The boards of education of two or more school districts may


enter into a mutual contract or separate contracts with a


superintendent, administrator, or teacher or with a person to


provide support services, to serve as superintendent, administrator,


or teacher, as appropriately qualified, or to provide support


services, for each contracting district upon such terms and


conditions as the parties may agree. Nothing in this section shall


be construed to authorize or require annexation or consolidation of


any school districts or the closing of any school site except


pursuant to law as set forth in Section 7-101 et seq. of this title.


E. Any school district may operate or maintain a school or


schools on any military reservation which is within the boundaries


of the school district or which is adjacent to the school district,

Req. No. 833 Page 14


and provide the instruction in the school or schools to children of


personnel on the military reservation and, in doing so, shall


conform to all federal laws and requirements.


F. The board of education of each school district shall adopt


and maintain on file in the office of the superintendent of schools


appropriate personnel policy and sick leave guide. The guide shall


be made available to the public.


G. The board of education of any school district with an


average daily membership of thirty thousand (30,000) or more and all


or part of which school district is located in a county having a


population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000) population


according to the latest Federal Decennial Census may contract with a


public or private nonsectarian entity for that entity to provide


educational and administrative services for the school district.


The educational services provided by a contracting entity may


include, but are not limited to, the delivery of instructional


service in core and noncore academic subjects to the students


enrolled in the school district at one or more school sites or parts


of sites within the district pursuant to the terms of an educational


services contract. All educational service providers and their


employees and representatives and all educational and administrative


services provided under an educational services contract shall be


exempt from all statutes and rules relating to schools, boards of


education, and school districts to the same extent that a charter

Req. No. 833 Page 15


school is exempt under the Oklahoma Charter Schools Act. All


educational service providers, their employees and representatives,


and all educational and administrative services provided pursuant to


an educational services contract shall afford parents and legal


guardians of students who are provided services by a contracting


entity pursuant to this subsection their rights provided by the


Parents’ Bill of Rights. For all purposes including, but not


limited to, attendance, funding from all sources, and


accountability, all students who are provided services by a


contracting entity pursuant to an educational services contract


shall at all times be and remain students of the school district.


H. Each school district board of education and its


administration shall be responsible for the content of all


instructional materials and any other materials used or made


available in a classroom or classroom library or included on a


reading list, whether such materials are purchased from the list of


textbooks, as defined in Section 16-102 of this title, or purchased


without the use of state-appropriated funds.


I. Each school district board of education shall adopt a policy


outlining procedures for the processing and resolution of objections


regarding the use of a specific instructional material provided


pursuant to subsection H of this section when the objection is


submitted by the parent or legal guardian of a student or a resident


of the school district. The board of education policy shall be easy

Req. No. 833 Page 16


to read and understand and be easily accessible on the home page of


the school district’s website. The objection shall be submitted on


a form prescribed by administrative rules promulgated by the State


Board of Education, and the school district board of education shall


include on the form the name, job title, and contact information of


the school district employee responsible for receiving objections


submitted pursuant to this subsection. The policy adopted by the


school district board of education shall allow a parent or legal


guardian of a student or a resident of the school district to submit


evidence that:


1. An instructional material does not meet the criteria of


subsection F of Section 16-102 of this title or subsection B of


Section 16-114a of this title;


2. An instructional material uses terms defined contrary to the


definitions provided for in Section 16 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma


Statutes if the material was selected for use in a course or made


available to students in the school district; or


3. An instructional material or any other material used or made


available in a classroom or classroom library or included on a


reading list contains content which:


a. is material described in Section 1021 of Title 21 of


the Oklahoma Statutes or is pornographic or obscene


material as the term is used in Section 1021.2 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes,

Req. No. 833 Page 17


b. depicts or describes sexual conduct, as defined in


Section 1024.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


unless such material is for a course for which a


parent or legal guardian has provided written consent


for a student to participate,


c. is not suited for the needs of students and their


abilities to comprehend the curriculum material being


presented, or


d. is not appropriate for the grade level for which the


instructional material is used.


J. 1. Any instructional material that is subject to an


objection based on subparagraphs a or b of paragraph 3 of subsection


I of this section shall be removed within five (5) school days of


receipt of the objection and shall remain unavailable to students


until the objection is resolved. Parents or legal guardians of a


student enrolled in the school district or a resident of the school


district shall be authorized to read passages from any instructional


material subject to an objection submitted for reasons outlined in


this paragraph.


2. If a school district board of education denies a parent or


legal guardian of a student enrolled in the district or a resident


of the school district the opportunity to read passages from an


instructional material due to content that meets the criteria of



Req. No. 833 Page 18


subparagraph b of paragraph 3 of subsection I of this section, the


school district shall discontinue use of the instructional material.


3. If a school district board of education finds that any


instructional material meets the criteria of paragraphs 1 or 2 of


subsection I of this section or that any instructional material


meets the criteria of subparagraph a of paragraph 3 of subsection I


of this section, the school district shall discontinue use of the


instructional material.


4. If a school district board of education finds that any


instructional material meets the criteria of subparagraphs b, c, or


d of paragraph 3 of subsection I of this section, the school


district shall discontinue use of the material for any grade level


for which such use is determined by the board to be inappropriate or


unsuitable.


K. Each school district board of education shall establish a


procedure through which the parent or legal guardian of a student


enrolled in the school district or a resident of the school district


may contest the board of education’s adoption of a specific


instructional material for reasons outlined in subsection F of


Section 16-102 of this title or subsection B of Section 24-157 of


this title. The parent or legal guardian of the student or a


resident of the school district shall submit a petition on a form


prescribed by the school district within thirty (30) calendar days


of the school district board of education’s adoption of the

Req. No. 833 Page 19


instructional material. The form shall be easily accessible on the


home page of the school district’s website. The form shall be


signed by the parent or legal guardian of the student enrolled in


the school district or the resident of the school district, include


contact information for the individual submitting the form, and


include the reason for the objection to the adoption of the


instructional material based on criteria provided for in this


subsection. Within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the form


submitted pursuant to this subsection, the school district board of


education shall conduct a minimum of one public hearing before a


board-appointed hearing officer, who shall not be an employee of the


school district. The hearing shall provide sufficient procedural


protections to allow each petitioner an adequate and fair


opportunity to be heard and present evidence to the hearing officer.


The hearing officer shall make a recommendation to the school


district board of education, and the board of education’s decision


shall be final, not subject to further review.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 106, O.S.L.


2022 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 11-201), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 11-201. A. As school library media center resources


are finite, the library media program shall be reflective of the


community standards for the population the library media center


serves when acquiring an age-appropriate collection of print

Req. No. 833 Page 20


materials, nonprint materials, multimedia resources, equipment, and


supplies adequate in quality and quantity to meet the needs of


students in all areas of the school library media program.


B. All print materials, nonprint materials, and multimedia


resources that are part of a library media center shall be subject


to the provisions of subsections H and I of Section 5-117 of this


title.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 16-102, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 16-102. A. The State Textbook Committee shall meet at


the call of the chair as often as necessary, with two (2) weeks’


public notice, to discharge its responsibilities. If necessary, not


later than the first day of December of each year the State Textbook


Committee shall meet to select textbooks for subjects taught in the


public schools of the state for grades prekindergarten through


twelve, which selections shall be for not more than six (6) years


for every textbook.


B. The Committee may suspend any currently pending selection


process of textbooks and may extend by at least two (2) years the


six-year adoption period of those textbooks currently on the state


adopted list, for the purpose of delaying for two (2) years the six-


year adoption cycle of subjects.


C. “Textbooks”, as As used in Sections 16-101 through 16-124 of


this title, “textbooks” means instructional materials that are

Req. No. 833 Page 21


designed for use by pupils as a learning resource. Instructional


materials may be printed or nonprinted and may include textbooks,


technology-based and other educational materials.


D. “List of textbooks” or “the list”, as As used in Sections


16-101 through 16-111 of this title, “list of textbooks” or “the


list” means the official textbook list required by Section 6 of


Article XIII of the Oklahoma Constitution. The list shall include


the textbooks and other instructional materials selected by the


State Textbook Committee for use in the common schools of the state.


E. 1. The State Department of Education, in coordination with


the State Textbook Committee, shall approve an application process


to assemble annually one or more review teams comprised of subject


matter experts for each subject area under review to assist the


Committee in reviewing textbooks and instructional materials. The


number of review teams shall be contingent on the number of subject


areas under review each year. Members of the review teams shall


have specific expertise in the subject areas being reviewed that


year. Review teams shall consist of no less fewer than twelve


members each, but may be as large as is deemed necessary by the


State Textbook Committee and the State Department of Education.


Subject to the availability of funds within the State Department of


Education, members of the review teams shall receive from the


Department necessary traveling expenses while in the performance of


duties pursuant to the State Travel Reimbursement Act.

Req. No. 833 Page 22


2. Members of review teams shall consider for recommendation


textbooks and instructional materials developed for academically


talented students including students enrolled in advanced placement


courses.


3. When recommending textbooks, each review team shall:


a. include only textbooks and instructional materials


that maintain that a person’s sex, as defined by


Section 16 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes, is an


immutable biological trait and that it is false to


ascribe to a person a pronoun that does not correspond


to a person’s sex. The provisions of this


subparagraph shall not apply to textbooks or


instructional materials that provide instruction about


individuals born with a genetically or biochemically


verifiable disorder of sex development (DSD)


including, but not limited to: 46,XX DSD; 46,XY DSD;


sex chromosomes DSDs; XX or XY sex reversal; and


ovotesticular disorder, and


b. require, when appropriate for the comprehension of


students, that materials for social studies, history,


or civics classes contain the culturally and


historically significant stories that shaped the


United States including, but not limited to, the


Federalist Papers, the Anti-Federalist Papers, the

Req. No. 833 Page 23


Declaration of Independence, and the United States


Constitution. A reviewer may not recommend any


textbook or instructional material that contains any


matter reflecting on an individual in such a way that


implies collective guilt upon persons because of their


race, color, creed, national origin, ancestry, gender,


religion, disability, socioeconomic status, or


occupation or that otherwise promotes concepts


prohibited by Section 24-157 of this title.


F. The Committee shall select textbooks or series of textbooks


for each subject, which, to the greatest extent possible, are


aligned with the subject matter standards adopted by the State Board


of Education pursuant to Section 11-103.6 of this title. The


Committee, in consultation with the State Department of Education,


shall adopt a rubric to be used by the review teams as a means of


evaluating textbooks submitted for review. The rubric shall contain


a three-tiered rating system in which the first tier shall be


labeled “Exemplifies Quality”, the second tier shall be labeled


“Approaching Quality”, and the third tier shall be labeled “Not


Representing Quality”. The rubric shall also include, but not be


limited to, criteria for alignment to subject matter standards such


that all standards are present and treated with the appropriate


depth to support students in learning the skills and information


contained in the subject matter standards, as well as usability for

Req. No. 833 Page 24


teacher planning, learning, assessment, and differentiated


instruction. The Committee, in consultation with the review teams,


may include additional criteria specific to the subject area being


reviewed. The rubric shall require each criterion to be scored


individually with justification, and shall provide an overall


recommendation for the rating.


G. Review teams shall review all materials in accordance with


the rubric adopted in pursuant to subsection F of this section and


shall submit the review and recommended rating to the Committee.


The Committee shall consider but not be required to accept the


recommended rating of the review teams. The Committee may request


that the review teams supply additional information to support their


recommendations, or the Committee may provide its own justification


utilizing the adopted rubric.


H. The Committee, having verified that the review process has


been conducted in a scrupulous and fair manner, shall adopt a final


rating for each textbook prior to including it on the textbook list


required by Section 16-110 of this title. The completed rubric for


each evaluated textbook, including the review team’s


recommendations, shall be made publicly available on the State


Textbook Committee website.


I. After a final textbook list is published, the State Textbook


Committee may determine that unusual or extraordinary circumstances


exist in a particular subject area during the period for which

Req. No. 833 Page 25


textbooks have been selected for that subject area. Unusual or


extraordinary circumstances shall include, but not be limited to,


significant new techniques of teaching in a particular subject area


or significant new findings or discoveries in a particular subject


area. Upon a determination by three-fourths (3/4) of the members of


the State Textbook Committee that unusual or extraordinary


circumstances exist in a particular subject area, the Committee may


select one or more textbooks in that subject area for the remainder


of the adoption period.


J. The State Department of Education shall house the website of


the State Textbook Committee on its agency website.


K. Five or more district boards of education may petition the


State Board of Education to add a book or series of textbooks to the


approved list selected by the State Textbook Committee.


L. Textbooks selected by the Committee shall be accurate,


objective, balanced, noninflammatory, current, suited to the needs


of students and their ability to comprehend the material presented,


and free from material described in Section 1021 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes or pornographic or obscene material as the term is


used in Section 1021.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


M. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to


implement the method and time frame for handling the petitions in


the most expeditious manner.



Req. No. 833 Page 26


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 16-111, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 16-111. A. Except as otherwise provided for in


subsection E of this section, the superintendent of schools of each


school district in the state shall appoint a local textbook


committee consisting of not fewer than three four nor more than nine


twelve members. Each committee shall have one lay member four


parents or legal guardians of students enrolled in the school


district, with the remainder of the members being teachers employed


in the public schools of the district, a majority of whom shall be


classroom teachers. The superintendent of schools or a designee who


shall be a principal or a curriculum specialist shall serve as


chairperson of the local textbook committee.


B. Upon the written request of any duly appointed local


textbook coordinator, the publisher of a textbook selected by the


State Textbook Committee shall furnish at least one examination copy


of the textbook and the teacher edition of the textbook, if one is


published, and a copy of software for purposes of complete


demonstration and review, if available, to the school district so


that the local textbook committee may examine any or all new


adoptions in the subjects taught or to be taught in schools in the


district.


C. Except as otherwise provided for in subsection E of this


section, on or before a date to be fixed by the State Board of

Req. No. 833 Page 27


Education, each local textbook committee shall adopt textbooks only


from the list of textbooks selected by the State Textbook Committee


in a manner as shall be prescribed by the State Board of Education.


In order for the local textbook committee to adopt a textbook that


was not reviewed by the State Textbook Committee, the local textbook


committee shall conduct a review process in a manner prescribed by


the State Board of Education and using the same criteria provided


for in Section 16-102 of this title. Each local textbook committee


shall serve without compensation and shall cease to exist when local


adoptions have been completed and shall be replaced by another local


textbook committee appointed in the same manner as provided for in


this section.


D. Except as otherwise provided for in subsection E of this


section, on or before a date to be fixed by the State Board of


Education, the superintendent of each school district shall submit


to the State Board of Education a textbook plan outlining the


estimated number of textbooks needed by the school district and the


total amount of money to be expended by the district for textbooks


including the allocated funds and any additional supplemental funds


to be expended. The superintendent or textbook coordinator


appointed by the superintendent shall place orders from the proper


depository or depositories for all of the textbooks needed as


outlined in the textbook plan by the district for the ensuing year.


The superintendent of a school district or textbook coordinator may

Req. No. 833 Page 28


order any textbooks placed on the official list of textbooks. If


the order exceeds the allocation for each school district as


provided in Section 16-114a of this title, any additional funds


expended shall be reported on the statement of expenditures for the


district.


E. 1. If a school district makes the election as provided for


in subsection B of Section 16-114a of this title, the district shall


not be required to appoint a local textbook committee, adopt


textbooks, submit a textbook plan, or expend money on the purchase


of textbooks during any fiscal year as provided for in this


subsection.


2. The provisions of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall cease


to be effective during the fiscal year which begins on the July 1


immediately succeeding the legislative session during which the


measure appropriating monies to the State Board of Education for the


financial support of public schools is enacted as law and such


appropriation amount is at least Fifty Million Dollars


($50,000,000.00) greater than the amount of money appropriated to


the State Board of Education for the financial support of public


schools for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2019. Provided, the


Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) shall not include any amount


of appropriations dedicated for support or certified employee salary


increases.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

Req. No. 833 Page 29


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-833 EB 1/3/2025 10:07:42 AM





































Req. No. 833 Page 30